Tennessee, session 114, SB2250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-68-103(b), is amended by deleting
the second sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-68-104(e), is amended by deleting
the language ", and the official's subsequent conviction pursuant to § 7-68-103(b)".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2250
012243
- 1 -